Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 49 Credit Card Crime Act

11-49-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Cardholder” means the person or organization named on the face of a credit card to whom or for whose benefit the credit card is issued by an issuer.

“Credit card” means any instrument or device, whether known as a credit card, credit plate, or by any other name, issued with or without fee by an issuer for the use of the card holder in obtaining money, goods, services, or anything else of value on credit.

“Expired credit card” means a credit card which is no longer valid because the term shown on it has elapsed.

“Issuer” means the business organization or financial institution, or its duly authorized agent, which issues a credit card.

“Receives” or “receiving” means acquiring possession or control or accepting as security for a loan a credit card.

“Revoked credit card” means a credit card which is no longer valid because permission to use it has been suspended or terminated by the issuer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 129, § 2.

11-49-2.
False statement as to financial condition or identity.

A person who makes or causes to be made, either directly or indirectly, any false statement as to a material fact in writing, knowing it to be false and with intent that it be relied on respecting his or her identity or that of any other person, firm, or corporation or his or her financial condition or that of any other person, firm, or corporation, for the purpose of procuring the issuance of a credit card, violates this section and is subject to the penalties set forth in §

11-49-10(a)

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 129, § 2.

11-49-3.
Theft — Obtaining credit card through fraudulent means.

Theft by taking or retaining possession of card taken. A person who takes a credit card from the person, possession, custody, or control of another without the cardholder’s consent, or who, with knowledge that it has been so taken, receives the credit card with intent to use it, to sell it, or to transfer it to a person other than the issuer or the cardholder, is guilty of credit card theft and is subject to the penalties set forth in §

11-49-10(a)

. Taking a credit card without consent includes obtaining it by conduct defined or known as statutory larceny, common law larceny by trespassory taking, common law larceny by trick or embezzlement, or obtaining property by false pretense, false promise, or extortion.

Theft of credit card lost, mislaid or delivered by mistake. A person who receives a credit card that he or she knows to have been lost, mislaid, or delivered under a mistake as to the identity or address of the cardholder and who retains possession with intent to use it, to sell it, or to transfer it to a person other than the issuer or the cardholder, is guilty of credit card theft and is subject to the penalties set forth in §

11-49-10(a)

.

Purchase or sale of credit card of another. A person other than the issuer who sells a credit card, or a person who buys a credit card from a person other than the issuer, violates this subsection and is subject to the penalties set forth in §

11-49-10(a)

.

Obtaining control of credit card as security for debt. A person who, with intent to defraud the issuer, a person or organization providing money, goods, services, or anything else of value, or any other person, obtains control over a credit card as security for debt violates this subsection and is subject to the penalties set forth in §

11-49-10(a)

.

Dealing in credit cards of another. A person other than the issuer who during any twelve (12) month period receives two (2) or more credit cards issued in the name or names of different cardholders, which he or she has reason to know were taken or retained under circumstances which constitute credit card theft or a violation of this law, violates this subsection and is subject to the penalties set forth in §

11-49-10(b)

.

Forgery of credit card. A person who, with intent to defraud a purported issuer or a person or organization providing money, goods, services, or anything else of value or any other person, falsely makes or embosses a purported credit card or utters a credit card is guilty of credit card forgery and is subject to the penalties set forth in §

11-49-10(b)

. A person other than the purported issuer who possesses two (2) or more credit cards which are falsely made or falsely embossed is presumed to have violated this subsection. A person falsely makes a credit card when he or she makes or draws in whole or in part a device or instrument which purports to be the credit card of a named issuer but which is not a credit card of the named issuer because the issuer did not authorize the making or drawing, or alters a credit card which was validly issued. A person falsely embosses a credit card when, without the authorization of the named issuer, he or she completes a credit card by adding any of the matter, other than the signature of the cardholder, which an issuer requires to appear on the credit card before it can be used by a cardholder.

Signing credit card of another. A person other than the cardholder or a person authorized by the cardholder who, with intent to defraud the issuer or a person or organization providing money, goods, services, or anything else of value or any other person, signs a credit card violates this subsection and is subject to the penalties set forth in §

11-49-10(a)

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 129, § 2.

11-49-4.
Fraudulent use of credit cards.

A person who, with intent to defraud the issuer or a person or organization providing money, goods, services, or anything else of value or any other person, uses, for the purpose of obtaining money, goods, services, or anything else of value, a credit card obtained or retained in violation of this law or a credit card which he or she knows is forged, expired, or revoked, or who obtains money, goods, services, or anything else of value by representing, without the consent of the cardholder, that he or she is the holder of a specified card or by representing that he or she is the holder of a card and the card has not in fact been issued, violates this section and is subject to the penalties set forth in §

11-49-10(a)

, if the value of all moneys, goods, services, and other things of value obtained in violation of this subsection does not exceed one hundred dollars ($100) in any six (6) month period. The violator is subject to the penalties set forth in §

11-49-10(b)

if the value does exceed one hundred dollars ($100) in any six (6) month period. Knowledge of revocation shall be presumed to have been received by a cardholder four (4) days after it has been mailed to him or her at the address set forth on the credit card or at his or her last known address by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, and, if the address is more than five hundred (500) miles from the place of mailing, by air mail. If the address is located outside the United States, Puerto Rico, the Virgin Islands, the Canal Zone or Canada, notice shall be presumed to have been received ten (10) days after mailing by registered or certified mail.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 129, § 2.

11-49-5.
Fraud by person authorized to provide goods or services.

Illegally obtained or illegally possessed credit card; forge. A person who is authorized by an issuer to furnish money, goods, services, or anything else of value upon presentation of a credit card by the cardholder or any agent or employees of the person who, with intent to defraud the issuer or the cardholder, furnishes money, goods, services, or anything else of value upon presentation of a credit card obtained or retained in violation of this law or a credit card which he or she knows is forged, expired, or revoked, violates this subsection and is subject to the penalties set forth in §

11-49-10(a)

, if the value of all money, goods, services, and other things of value furnished in violation of this subsection does not exceed one hundred dollars ($100) in any six (6) month period. The violator is subject to the penalties set forth in §

11-49-10(b)

if the value does exceed one hundred dollars ($100) in any six (6) month period.

Misrepresentation to issuer. A person who is authorized by an issuer to furnish money, goods, services, or anything else of value upon presentation of a credit card by the cardholder or any agent or employee of the person who, with intent to defraud the issuer or the cardholder, fails to furnish money, goods, services, or anything else of value which he or she represents in writing to the issuer that he has furnished, violates this subsection and is subject to the penalties set forth in §

11-49-10(a)

, if the difference between the value of all money, goods, services, and anything else of value actually furnished and the value represented to the issuer to have been furnished, does not exceed five hundred dollars ($500) in any six (6) month period. The violator is subject to the penalties set forth in §

11-49-10(b)

if the difference does exceed five hundred dollars ($500) in any six (6) month period.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 129, § 2.

11-49-6.
Possession of machinery, plates or other contrivance or incomplete credit cards.

A person other than the cardholder possessing two (2) or more incomplete credit cards with intent to complete them without the consent of the issuer or a person possessing with knowledge of its character any machinery, plates, or any other contrivance designed to reproduce instruments purporting to be the credit cards of an issuer who has not consented to the preparation of the credit cards violates this section and is subject to the penalties set forth in §

11-49-10(b)

. A credit card is incomplete if part of the matter other than the signature of the cardholder, which an issuer requires to appear on the credit card before it can be used by a cardholder, has not yet been stamped, embossed, imprinted, or written on it.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 129, § 2.

11-49-6.1.
Publishing information for fraudulent purposes.

It shall be unlawful for any person to publish or cause to be published the number or code of an existing, cancelled, revoked, expired, or nonexistent credit card issued by a company providing telecommunication services or the numbering or coding system which is employed in the issuance of those credit cards, or any method, scheme, instruction, or information on how to fraudulently avoid payment for telecommunication services, with the intent that the number or coding system or information be used or with knowledge that the system or information are to be used to fraudulently avoid the payment of any lawful charges imposed by the telecommunications company.

As used in this section, “publishes” means the communication of information to any one or more persons, either orally, in person, or by telephone, radio, or television, or in writing of any kind, including a letter or memorandum, circular, poster, or handbill, newspaper or magazine article, or book with the intent that the information be used or employed in violation of this section.

Any person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, may be imprisoned for not more than one year, or fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or both.

Any person convicted of a second or subsequent offense of this section shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, may be imprisoned for not more than three (3) years or fined not more than three thousand dollars ($3,000), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 60, § 2.

11-49-7.
Receipt of money, goods and services obtained by fraudulent use of credit cards.

A person who receives money, goods, services, or anything else of value obtained in violation of §

11-49-4

, knowing or believing that it was so obtained, violates this section and is subject to the penalties set forth in §

11-49-10(a)

. A person who obtains at a discount price a ticket issued by an airline, railroad, steamship, or other transportation company, which was acquired in violation of §

11-49-4

without reasonable inquiry to ascertain that the person from whom it was obtained had a legal right to possess it, shall be presumed to know that the ticket was acquired under circumstances constituting a violation of § 11-49-4.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 129, § 2.

11-49-8.
Defense not available.

In any prosecution for violation of this chapter, the state is not required to establish and it is no defense that a person, other than the defendant, who violated this chapter has not been convicted, apprehended, or identified.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 129, § 2.

11-49-9.
Repealed.

11-49-10.
Penalties.

A person who is subject to the penalties of this subsection shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or imprisoned not more than one year, or both.

A person who is subject to the penalties of this subsection shall be fined not more than three thousand dollars ($3,000), or imprisoned not more than three (3) years, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 129, § 2.

11-49-11.
Chapter not exclusive.

This chapter shall not be construed to preclude the applicability of any other provision of the criminal law of this state which presently applies or may in the future apply to any transaction which violates this chapter, unless that provision is inconsistent with the terms of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 129, § 2.

11-49-12.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 129, § 2.

11-49-13.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Credit Card Crime Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 129, § 2.